New York, session 2025-2026, S5938.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "service 2 delivery transparency act". 3 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 13 to read 4 as follows: 5 § 13. State management report. 1. Definitions. For purposes of this 6 section: 7 (a) "State agency" shall mean any state department, board, bureau, 8 division, commission, committee, public authority, public benefit corpo- 9 ration, council, office, or other governmental entity in the executive 10 branch of government performing a governmental or proprietary function 11 for the state. 12 (b) "Performance goals" shall mean goals and metrics which: (i) 13 provide improved transparency to the public about the state's perform- 14 ance and quality of life in the state; (ii) are in a format that allows 15 the public to better understand the agency's service delivery processes, 16 including what occurs at each step of the process and how long each step 17 takes to complete; and (iii) are updated as frequently as practicable 18 and shall provide the most recent data with a minimum of lag time. 19 2. Not later than January thirtieth of each year, the governor shall 20 make public and submit to the temporary president of the senate and the 21 speaker of the assembly a preliminary management report of the state and 22 not later than September fifteenth of each year the governor shall make 23 public and submit to the temporary president of the senate and the 24 speaker of the assembly a management report of the state. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09237-01-5 S. 5938 2 1 3. The preliminary management report shall contain for each state 2 agency: 3 (a) a statement of actual performance for the first six months of the 4 current fiscal year relative to the performance goals and measures 5 established for such year; 6 (b) proposed performance goals and measures for the next fiscal year, 7 reflecting budgetary decisions made as of the date of submission of the 8 proposed budget submitted annually by the governor to the legislature; 9 (c) an explanation in narrative and/or tabular form of significant 10 changes in the performance goals and measures from the current budget to 11 the proposed budget submitted annually by the governor to the legisla- 12 ture; and 13 (d) an appendix indicating the relationship between the performance 14 goals and measures included in the management report and the correspond- 15 ing appropriations contained in the proposed budget submitted annually 16 by the governor to the legislature. 17 4. The management report shall contain for each agency: 18 (a) performance goals for the current fiscal year and a statement and 19 explanation of performance measures; 20 (b) a statement of actual performance for the entire previous fiscal 21 year relative to performance goals; 22 (c) a statement of the status of the agency's internal control envi- 23 ronment and systems, including a summary of any actions taken during the 24 previous fiscal year, and any actions being taken during the current 25 fiscal year to strengthen the agency's internal control environment and 26 system; 27 (d) a summary of rulemaking actions undertaken by the agency during 28 the past fiscal year including: 29 (i) the number of rulemaking actions taken; 30 (ii) the number of such actions which were not noticed in the regula- 31 tory agenda prepared for such fiscal year, including a summary of the 32 reasons such rules were not included in such regulatory agenda; and 33 (iii) the number of such actions which were adopted under emergency 34 rulemaking procedures; 35 (e) a summary of the procurement actions taken during the previous 36 fiscal year; 37 (f) information regarding how well the agency is serving its customers 38 including timeliness in responding to emails, letters and service 39 requests; and 40 (g) an appendix indicating the relationship between the performance 41 goals included in the management report and the corresponding expendi- 42 tures made pursuant to the adopted budget for the previous fiscal year. 43 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.